apertium-eo-en.eo.eksperimenta_parto.dix
<!-- specialaj difinoj por kunmetitaj vortoj  -->

<pardef n="nur_radiko">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="radiko">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-only-L"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="radiko_vortfino">
  <e><par n="nur_radiko"/></e>
  <e><par n="vortfino"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="sgplnomacc_kunmetebla">
  <e>       <p><l></l>          <r><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="radiko_vortfino"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>j</l>         <r><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p><par n="vortfino"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="vortfino"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>jn</l>        <r><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p><par n="vortfino"/></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="sp"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l>n</l>         <r><s n="sp"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="vortfino">
  <e r="LR"><p><l></l>          <r><s n="compound-R"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="RL"><p><l></l>          <r></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="e__adv">
  <e>       <p><l>e</l>         <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="vortfino"/></e>
  <e><p><l></l>          <r>e<s n="adv"/></r></p><par n="nur_radiko"/></e>
</pardef>
